el: Υλικό δοχείου ωρίμανσης: Ξύλο amburana; Βαρέλι μπέρμπον; Πήλινο/κεραμικό δοχείο; Δρύινο βαρέλι; Βαρέλι σέρι; Δεξαμενή από ανοξείδωτο χάλυβα; Μη παλαιωμένο; Ξύλο ζέμπρανο (Araribá); Άλλο
es: Material del recipiente de maduración: Madera de amburana; Barril de bourbon; Olla de barro/cerámica; Barril de roble; Barril de jerez; Tanque de acero inoxidable; Sin añejar; Madera de cebra (araribá); Otro
tr: Olgunlaştırma kabı malzemesi: Amburana ahşabı; Burbon fıçısı; Kil/seramik çömlek; Meşe fıçı; Şeri fıçısı; Paslanmaz çelik tank; Yıllandırılmamış; Zebrano ahşabı (Araribá); Diğer
nl: Materiaal rijpingsvat: Amburana-hout; Bourbonvat; Aarden/keramische pot; Eikenhouten vat; Sherryvat; Roestvrijstalen tank; Niet-gerijpt; Zebrahout (Araribá); Overige
en: Maturation vessel material: Amburana wood; Bourbon barrel; Clay/ceramic pot; Oak barrel; Sherry cask; Stainless steel tank; Unaged; Zebrawood (Araribá); Other
th: วัสดุของภาชนะสำหรับบ่ม: ไม้อัมบูรัน; ถังเบอร์เบิน; หม้อดินเผา/เซรามิก; ถังไม้โอ๊ค; ถังแชร์รี; ถังสเตนเลส; ไม่บ่ม; ไม้ลายม้าลาย (Araribá); อื่นๆ
ru: Материал емкости для выдержки: Древесина амбураны; Бочка из-под бурбона; Глиняный/керамический кувшин; Дубовая бочка; Бочка из-под хереса; Резервуар из нержавеющей стали; Невыдержанный; Зебрано (арариба); Другое
cs: Materiál vyzrávací nádoby: Dřevo amburana; Sud od bourbonu; Hliněná/keramická nádoba; Dubový sud; Sud od sherry; Nerezová nádrž; Nezrající; Zebrawood (araribá); Jiné
nb: Materiale i modningskar: Amburanatre; Bourbonfat; Leir-/keramikkrukke; Eikefat; Sherryfat; Rustfri ståltank; Ulagret; Sebratre (Araribá); Annet
pt-PT: Material do recipiente de maturação: Madeira de amburana; Barril de bourbon; Pote de barro/cerâmica; Barril de carvalho; Barril de xerez; Tanque de aço inoxidável; Não envelhecido; Madeira de zebra (Araribá); Outro
da: Materiale for modningsbeholder: Amburana-træ; Bourbonfad; Ler-/keramikkrukke; Egetræsfad; Sherryfad; Rustfri ståltank; Ulagret; Zebratræ (Araribá); Andet
fi: Kypsytysastian materiaali: Amburanapuu; Bourbon-tynnyri; Savi-/keraaminen ruukku; Tammitynnyri; Sherrytynnyri; Ruostumaton terässäiliö; Kypsyttämätön; Seeprapuu (Araribá); Muu
hu: Érlelőtartály anyaga: Amburana fa; Bourbon hordó; Agyag/kerámia edény; Tölgyfa hordó; Sherry hordó; Rozsdamentes acéltartály; Érleletlen; Zebrano fa (Araribá); Egyéb
de: Material des Reifungsgefäßes: Amburana-Holz; Bourbonfass; Ton-/Keramiktopf; Eichenfass; Sherryfass; Edelstahltank; Ungereift; Zebraholz (Araribá); Sonstiges
hr-HR: Materijal posude za sazrijevanje: Drvo amburane; Bačva za burbon; Glinena/keramička posuda; Hrastova bačva; Bačva za šeri; Spremnik od nehrđajućeg čelika; Neodležano; Zebrano (araribá); Ostalo
zh-CN: 熟成容器材质: 安布拉纳木; 波本桶; 陶/瓷罐; 橡木桶; 雪莉桶; 不锈钢罐; 未陈酿; 斑马木 (Araribá); 其他
ja: 熟成タンク素材: アンブラーナウッド; バーボン樽; 土/陶磁器の壺; オーク樽; シェリー樽; ステンレスタンク; 非熟成; ゼブラウッド (アラリバ); その他
vi: Chất liệu của thùng/bình ủ chín: Gỗ Amburana; Thùng Bourbon; Bình đất sét/gốm; Thùng gỗ sồi; Thùng Sherry; Thùng thép không gỉ; Không ủ; Gỗ ngựa vằn (Araribá); Khác
fr: Matériau de la cuve de maturation: Bois d’Amburana; Fût de bourbon; Pot en argile/céramique; Fût de chêne; Fût de xérès; Cuve en acier inoxydable; Non vieilli; Zebrano (Araribá); Autre
lt-LT: Brandinimo indo medžiaga: Amburanos mediena; Burbono statinė; Molinis / keraminis indas; Ąžuolinė statinė; Chereso statinė; Nerūdijančio plieno talpykla; Nebrandintas; Zebranas („Araribá“); Kita
sl-SI: Material posode za zorenje: Les amburane; Sod za burbon; Glinena/keramična posoda; Hrastov sod; Sod za šeri; Rezervoar iz nerjavnega jekla; Nestarano; Zebrano (arariba); Drugo
it: Materiale del contenitore di maturazione: Legno di amburana; Botte di bourbon; Vaso di argilla/ceramica; Botte di rovere; Botte di sherry; Serbatoio in acciaio inossidabile; Non invecchiato; Zebrano (Araribá); Altro
sv: Lagringsbehållarens material: Amburanaträ; Bourbonfat; Ler-/keramikkruka; Ekfat; Sherryfat; Rostfri ståltank; Olagrad; Zebraträ (araribá); Annat
sk-SK: Materiál zrecej nádoby: Drevo amburana; Sud od bourbonu; Hlinená/keramická nádoba; Dubový sud; Sud od sherry; Nádrž z nehrdzavejúcej ocele; Bez zrenia; Zebrano (araribá); Iné
ko: 숙성 용기 소재: 암부라나 나무; 버번 배럴; 점토/세라믹 항아리; 오크 배럴; 셰리 캐스크; 스테인리스 스틸 탱크; 비숙성; 지브라 우드(아라리바); 기타
zh-TW: 熟成容器材質: 安布拉納木 (Amburana); 波本桶; 陶/瓷甕; 橡木桶; 雪莉桶; 不鏽鋼桶; 未陳年; 斑馬木 (Araribá); 其他
pl: Materiał naczynia do leżakowania: Drewno amburana; Beczka po bourbonie; Naczynie gliniane/ceramiczne; Beczka dębowa; Beczka po sherry; Zbiornik ze stali nierdzewnej; Niestarzone; Drewno zebrano (arariba); Inne
ro-RO: Materialul vasului de maturare: Lemn de amburana; Butoi de bourbon; Vas de lut/ceramică; Butoi de stejar; Butoi de sherry; Rezervor din oțel inoxidabil; Neînvechit; Lemn zebrano (Araribá); Altele
pt-BR: Material do recipiente de maturação: Madeira de amburana; Barril de bourbon; Pote de barro/cerâmica; Barril de carvalho; Barril de xerez; Tanque de aço inoxidável; Não envelhecido; Madeira zebra (Araribá); Outro
bg-BG: Материал на съда за зреене: Дърво амбурана; Бъчва от бърбън; Глинен/керамичен съд; Дъбова бъчва; Бъчва от шери; Резервоар от неръждаема стомана; Неотлежало; Зебрано (Арариба); Друго